Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Article 1. State Fiscal Officer.

§ 7-7-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the terms “State Auditor” and “Auditor” mean the Auditor of Public Accounts.

As used in this chapter, the term “State Fiscal Officer” means the official created in Section 27-104-5, acting through the Bureau of Budget and Fiscal Management.

“Agency” means any state board, commission, committee, council, department or unit thereof created by the Constitution or statutes if such board, commission, committee, council, department, unit or the head thereof is authorized to appoint subordinate staff by the Constitution or statute, except a legislative or judicial board, commission, committee, council, department or unit thereof.

For the purposes of Sections 7-7-1 through 7-7-65, the term “public funds” shall mean all funds which are received, collected by, or available for the support of or expenditure by any state department, institution or agency, whether such funds be derived from taxes or from fees collected by such state department, institution or agency or from some other source, and which should be included in the entity of the state under generally accepted accounting principles, although such funds may not be required by law to be deposited in the State Treasury.

Funds such as endowment funds and research funds, special building and plant funds, funds of a proprietary function, and the like shall be excluded from the meaning of the term, unless specifically required by law to be handled through the State Treasury or unless deemed necessary by the State Fiscal Officer to be included.

All funds of state departments, institutions and agencies within the contemplation of this section that are not required by law to be deposited in the State Treasury, or are not declared to be exempt from the provisions of Sections 7-7-1 through 7-7-65 by the State Fiscal Officer shall be reported to the State Fiscal Officer in reports of revenues, expenditures, assets, liabilities, encumbrances, fund balances and other financial statements, at such times and in the form required by the State Fiscal Officer.

It is hereby declared to be the intent of this section to provide that all “public funds” necessary to present a complete and comprehensive statement of the fiscal operations of the state government shall be handled through the State Fiscal Officer, whether through State Fiscal Officer receipt warrants and disbursement warrants, as is generally provided, or through the method of reporting, as required herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 422, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 91; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-2.
Transfer of functions of state fiscal management board to state fiscal officer.

The Mississippi General Accounting Office and the State Fiscal Officer, acting through the Bureau of Budget and Fiscal Management, shall be the Department of Public Accounts formerly in the Office of the State Auditor of Public Accounts.

The words “State Auditor of Public Accounts,” “State Auditor” and “Auditor” appearing in the laws of this state in connection with the performance of Auditor’s functions shall mean the State Fiscal Officer, and, more particularly, such words or terms shall mean the State Fiscal Officer whenever they appear in Sections 5-1-57, 5-1-59, 5-3-23, 7-1-33, 7-1-63, 7-3-29, 7-5-31, 7-11-25, 17-13-11, 9-1-36, 9-3-7, 9-3-23, 9-3-27, 9-3-29, 9-3-45, 11-35-11, 11-45-1, 21-33-47, 21-33-401, 23-5-215, 25-1-75, 25-1-81, 25-1-95, 25-1-98, 25-3-41, 25-3-51, 25-3-53, 25-3-55, 25-3-57, 25-3-59, 25-3-97, 25-7-7, 25-7-83, 25-9-135, 25-31-8, 25-31-10, 25-31-37, 27-1-35, 27-3-43, 27-3-45, 27-3-57, 27-3-59, 27-5-22, 27-5-103, 27-7-45, 27-7-313, 27-9-49, 27-11-3, 27-13-55, 27-15-203, 27-15-239, 27-15-241, 27-21-13, 27-29-1, 27-29-5, 27-29-11, 27-29-13, 27-29-15, 27-29-17, 27-29-25, 27-29-33, 27-31-109, 27-33-11, 27-33-41, 27-33-45, 27-33-47, 27-35-121, 27-35-149, 27-37-303, 27-39-13, 27-39-319, 27-41-19, 27-41-23, 27-41-25, 27-41-27, 27-41-41, 27-41-75, 27-45-1, 27-45-13, 27-45-19, 27-49-5, 27-49-9, 27-55-19, 27-55-47, 27-55-555, 27-57-35, 27-59-51, 27-65-51, 27-65-53, 27-67-29, 27-69-3, 27-69-73, 27-69-77, 27-71-301, 27-71-305, 27-71-339, 27-73-1, 27-73-7, 27-73-11, 27-103-55, 27-103-67, 27-105-7, 27-105-19, 27-105-21, 27-105-23, 27-105-33, 27-107-11, 27-107-59, 27-107-81, 27-107-101, 27-107-121, 27-107-141, 27-107-157, 27-107-173, 29-1-27, 29-1-79, 29-1-85, 29-1-87, 29-1-93, 29-1-95, 29-1-111, 31-3-17, 31-7-9, 31-9-15, 31-17-3, 31-17-59, 31-17-105, 31-19-17, 31-19-19, 31-19-21, 31-19-23, 31-5-15, 33-9-11, 35-7-45, 35-9-3, 35-9-5, 35-9-27, 35-9-29, 35-9-33, 37-3-7, 37-3-15, 37-3-17, 37-3-39, 37-13-33, 37-19-27, 37-19-29, 37-19-45, 37-19-47, 37-25-27, 37-27-17, 37-29-165, 37-31-41, 37-33-31, 37-33-71, 37-43-47, 37-101-103, 37-101-149, 37-109-25, 37-113-5, 37-133-7, 39-1-31, 39-3-109, 41-3-13, 41-4-19, 41-7-25, 41-73-71, 43-9-35, 43-13-113, 43-29-29, 45-1-11, 45-1-23, 47-5-77, 47-5-155, 49-1-65, 49-5-21, 49-5-97, 49-17-69, 49-19-1, 51-33-77, 51-33-79, 51-33-81, 51-33-87, 53-1-77, 55-3-41, 57-4-21, 57-9-5, 57-10-123, 57-13-7, 57-13-19, 57-15-5, 59-5-53, 59-7-103, 59-9-71, 59-17-47, 63-19-51, 65-1-111, 65-1-117, 65-9-9, 65-9-17, 65-9-25, 65-11-43, 65-11-45, 65-23-107, 65-26-7, 65-26-35, 69-9-5, 69-15-113, 71-5-359, 73-5-5, 73-6-9, 73-19-13, 73-36-17, 75-75-109, 77-3-89, 77-9-493, 77-11-201, 81-1-49, 83-1-13, 83-1-37, 83-1-39, 83-43-7, 83-43-21, 89-11-27, 97-11-29, 97-21-1, 97-21-61 and 99-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 90; Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 461, § 35; Laws, 2017, ch. 404, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 7-7-3.
General Accounting Office; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

There is hereby established a General Accounting Office for the State of Mississippi, the powers and duties of said office to be performed by the Bureau of Budget and Fiscal Management under the administration of the State Fiscal Officer.

The Chief of the Fiscal Management Division, under the supervision of the State Fiscal Officer, shall prescribe and implement in the office of each state agency an adequate accrual accounting system, in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles, and a system for keeping other essential financial records or, in lieu thereof, may install a state centralized automated accounting system which facilitates reporting the financial position and operations of the state as a whole, in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles. All such accounting systems so prescribed or installed shall be as uniform as may be practicable for agencies and offices of the same class and character.

Each state agency shall adopt and use the system prescribed and approved for it by the State Fiscal Officer, and the State Fiscal Officer shall have the authority and power to impound all funds of such agency until it complies with the provisions of this section. Said state centralized automated accounting system shall be made available to the agencies of state government through the services of the State Computer Center. The State Fiscal Officer shall conduct training seminars on a regular basis to ensure that agencies have access to persons proficient in the correct use of the statewide automated accounting system.

The State Fiscal Officer shall establish an oversight advisory committee to ensure that the state centralized automated accounting system meets the needs of the agencies served thereby. Said oversight advisory committee shall be composed of qualified public employees proficient in the areas of fiscal management, accounting, data processing and other fields affected by the automated accounting and financial management system. Said committee shall have the following responsibilities:

Provide continual review of laws, rules, regulations, policies and procedures which affect the continued successful implementation of the state automated accounting and financial management system;

Coordination among the control agencies of state and federal government to identify required modifications and/or enhancements to the state centralized automated accounting system as required for successful implementation;

Ensure that agencies using the system are in compliance with the requirements of the various control agencies; and

Assign persons knowledgeable in their area of expertise and proper use of the state centralized automated accounting system to help agencies use the system correctly.

The State Fiscal Officer shall provide for the continuing support of the state centralized automated accounting system from funds appropriated therefor by the Legislature and/or from user fees charged to the state agencies and institutions utilizing the system.

The State Fiscal Officer may charge fees to agencies and institutions for services rendered to them in conjunction with the statewide automated accounting system. The amounts of such fees shall be set by the State Fiscal Officer, and all such fees collected shall be paid into the Statewide Automated Accounting System Fund.

There is hereby established within the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund. This fund is established for the purpose of developing and maintaining an executive information system within state government. Such a system may include the state centralized automated accounting system, a centralized automated human resource/payroll system for state agencies and the automation of performance programmatic data and other data as needed by the legislative and executive branches to monitor the receipt and expenditure of funds in accordance with desired objectives.

A Steering Committee consisting of the State Fiscal Officer, the Executive Director of the State Personnel Board and the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall establish policies and procedures for the administration of the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund.

All disbursements from this fund shall be made pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature. All interest earned from the investment of monies in this fund shall be credited to such fund.

Any expenditure of funds related to the development of a Mississippi Management and Reporting System by the State Personnel Board, the Department of Finance and Administration and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services made during the fiscal year ending June 30, 1993, shall be reimbursable from the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund upon its establishment.

The Bond Commission is hereby authorized to grant a noninterest-bearing loan to the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund from the State Treasurer’s General Fund/Special Fund Pool in an amount not to exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00).

The Mississippi Management and Reporting System Steering Committee shall appoint an administrator of the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund. The salary of the administrator and all other project administrative expenses shall be disbursed from the revolving fund. The administrator of the fund is hereby authorized to employ or secure personnel service contracts for all personnel required to carry out this project. On or before January 15 of each year, the State Fiscal Officer shall present a report of all expenditures made during the previous fiscal year from the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund to the State Bond Commission and to the Legislature.

Upon implementation of the Mississippi Management and Reporting System, or any part thereof, at any state agency, a repayment schedule shall be determined by the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund administrator for payment back into the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund. This repayment schedule will include direct and indirect expenses of implementing the Mississippi Management and Reporting System at each agency and applied interest charges. Each state agency shall be required to request the amount of its yearly repayment in its annual budget request.

At the completion of the Mississippi Management and Reporting System, the Steering Committee shall recommend to the Legislature an amount to remain in the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund to fund future upgrades and maintenance for the system. The remaining amount, as repaid by the agencies, shall be returned to the General Fund/Special Fund Pool.

Each state agency executive director shall participate in the Mississippi Management and Reporting System (MMRS) project by appointing an agency implementation team leader to represent them on the MMRS project. All agencies will be required to implement the MMRS unless exempted from such by the MMRS Steering Committee. If such an exemption is granted, the MMRS Steering Committee may require selected data to be electronically interfaced into the MMRS.

In addition to his other duties, the Chief of the Fiscal Management Division shall perform the following services:

Maintain a set of control accounts on a double entry accrual basis for each state fund so as to analyze, classify and record all resources, obligations and financial transactions of all state agencies.

Submit to the Governor and to the Legislative Budget Office a monthly report containing the state’s financial operations and conditions.

Approve as to form the manner in which all payrolls shall be prepared; and require each state agency to furnish copies of monthly payrolls as required to the State Fiscal Officer. The Chief of the Fiscal Management Division shall study the feasibility of a central payroll system for all state officers and employees, and report his findings and recommendations to the Legislature.

Require of each state agency, through its governing board or executive head, the maintaining of continuous internal audit covering the activities of such agency affecting its revenue and expenditures, and an adequate internal system of preauditing claims, demands and accounts against such agency as to adequately ensure that only valid claims, demands and accounts will be paid, and to verify compliance with the regulations of the State Personal Service Contract Review Board regarding the execution of any personal service or professional service contracts pursuant to Section 25-9-120(3). The Fiscal Management Division shall report to the State Fiscal Officer any failure or refusal of the governing board or executive head of any state agency to comply with the provisions of this section. The State Fiscal Officer shall notify the said board of trustees or executive head of such violation and, upon continued failure or refusal to comply with the provisions of this section, then the State Fiscal Officer may require said board of trustees or executive head of such state agency to furnish competent and adequate personnel to carry out the provisions of this section, who shall be responsible to the State Fiscal Officer for the performance of such function with respect to such state agency. For failure or refusal to comply with the provisions of this section or the directions of the State Fiscal Officer, any such employee may be deprived of the power to perform such functions on behalf of the Fiscal Management Division.

Every state agency, through the proper officials or employee, shall make such periodic or special reports on forms prescribed by the Chief of the Fiscal Management Division as may be required or necessary to maintain the set of control accounts required. If any officer or employee of any state agency whose duty it is to do so shall refuse or fail to make such periodic or special reports in such form and in such detail and within such time as the Fiscal Management Division may require in the exercise of this authority, the State Fiscal Officer shall prepare or cause to be prepared and submitted such reports and the expense thereof shall be personally borne by said officer or employee and he or she shall be responsible on his or her official bond for the payment of the expense. Provided that a negligently prepared report shall be considered as a refusal or failure under the provisions of this section.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 92; Laws, 1986, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 485, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 609, § 7; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 7-7-5.
Location and hours of office.

The Bureau of Budget and Fiscal Management of the General Accounting Office shall be located at the seat of government, and the bureau shall be open Monday through Friday of each week for eight (8) hours each day.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 20, art. 3 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art. 28; 1871, § 129; 1880, § 215; 1892, § 225; 1906, § 235; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3494; 1930, § 3722; 1942, §§ 3852, 3852-02; Laws, 1904, ch. 139; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 542, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 93; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-7.
State fiscal officer to appoint necessary employees; bonds.

The State Fiscal Officer shall appoint such bureau and division heads, contractors and other employees as are necessary for the proper discharge of the duties of the General Accounting Office subject to the provisions of the State Personnel Law. The State Fiscal Officer shall be officially responsible for the acts of all other employees of his office in the same manner as if done by himself.

The State Fiscal Officer shall require bonds of his assistant and other employees at his pleasure. The premiums on said bonds shall be paid for as prescribed elsewhere in the laws of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3852-04, 3867-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 542, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 94; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-9.
General accounting system.

The Mississippi General Accounting Office shall maintain a complete system of general accounting to comprehend the financial transactions of every state department, division, officer, board, commission, institution or other agency owned or controlled by the state, except those agencies specifically exempted in Section 7-7-1, whether at the seat of government or not and whether the funds upon which they operate are channeled through the State Treasury or not, either through regular procedures having to do with the issuance of the State Fiscal Officer receipt warrants and disbursement warrants or through controls maintained through reports filed periodically as required by the State Fiscal Officer in accordance with the reporting provisions contained in said Section 7-7-1.

All transactions in public funds, as defined in Section 7-7-1, shall either be handled directly through the State Fiscal Officer and the State Treasury, or shall be reported to the State Fiscal Officer at the times and in the form prescribed by the State Fiscal Officer and the Legislative Budget Office, so that a complete and comprehensive system of accounts of the fiscal activities of all state governmental agencies shall be made available at all times in the General Accounting Office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 95; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-11.
Penalty for failure to make required reports.

If any officer or employee of any state agency shall refuse or fail to make any report to the State Fiscal Officer or the Legislative Budget Office as required herein or in the manner prescribed by the said State Fiscal Officer, the State Fiscal Officer shall proceed to make, or cause to be made, the said report. The expense thereof shall be personally borne by said officer or employee, and he or she shall be responsible on his or her official bond for the expense so incurred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 96; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 124, eff from and after October 1, 1986 (see Editor’s Note below).

§7-7-13. [Codes, 1942, § 3852-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 7]

§ 7-7-15.
State Fiscal Officer to receive all moneys for deposit in state treasury.

Every state department, division, officer, board, commission, institution or other agency owned or controlled by the state, collecting or receiving public funds or monies from any source whatever to be deposited in the State Treasury for the use of the state or any state agency, shall pay such monies to the State Fiscal Officer, who shall issue his warrant or certificate of receipt therefor, specifying the amount and the particular account on which such payment is to be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 97; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 8; Laws, 1994, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 7-7-17.
State Fiscal Officer to receive reports of receipts of public funds not to be deposited into state treasury.

Reports shall be filed with the State Fiscal Officer at the time and in the manner prescribed by the State Fiscal Officer by all state departments, institutions and agencies of all receipts of public funds, as defined in Section 7-7-1, which are not required by law to be deposited into the State Treasury but into banks bonded to be depositories of such funds, so that the State Fiscal Officer may keep comprehensive records and may make complete periodic reports concerning all public funds belonging to or for the use of the state and those agencies owned or controlled by the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-09; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 98; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§§ 7-7-19 and 7-7-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§7-7-19. [Codes, 1942, § 3852-10; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 99]

§7-7-21. [Codes, 1942, § 3852-11; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 11; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 100]

§ 7-7-23.
Purchase orders; receipt of executed copies; electronically submitted purchase orders.

Purchases of equipment, supplies, materials or services of whatever kind or nature for any department, officer, institution or other agency of the state, the cost of which is to be paid from funds in the State Treasury on State Fiscal Officer disbursement warrants, may be made only by written purchase orders duly signed by the official authorized so to do, on forms prescribed by the State Fiscal Officer. Purchases of such equipment, supplies, materials, or services, as specified herein, made without the issuance of such purchase orders shall not be deemed to be obligations of the state unless the State Fiscal Officer, by general rule or special order, permits certain purchases to be made without same. As many copies of each purchase order shall be prepared as may be prescribed by the State Fiscal Officer, but at least one (1) copy shall be furnished the vendor, one (1) copy shall be furnished the State Fiscal Officer, and one (1) copy shall be retained by the department or agency for whose benefit the purchase is made. The State Fiscal Officer, by general rule or special order, may allow for the submission of purchase orders in a format not requiring a signature. It shall be the duty of the proper official in each department or agency to forward the copy of each purchase order to the State Fiscal Officer on the same day the said order is issued. All purchase orders covering purchases to be paid for out of funds appropriated for any fiscal year shall be executed by June 30 of the fiscal year and shall be filed with and received for recording by the State Fiscal Officer within five (5) working days thereafter, and for electronically submitted purchase orders, the State Fiscal Officer shall issue regulations as to the last filing date required for purchase orders; otherwise, the same shall not be deemed to constitute valid obligations against the state within the meaning of Section 64 of the Constitution. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to contracts for services of investigators employed by any agency of the state government authorized by law to employ such investigators.

The State Fiscal Officer may approve electronically submitted purchase orders, thereby releasing such purchase orders and recording the encumbrances. For purposes of electronically submitted purchase orders, the State Fiscal Officer may exempt agencies from furnishing a copy of the purchase order to the State Fiscal Officer as required in subsection (1) above.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-12; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 12; Laws, 1970, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 101; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 10; Laws, 1994, ch. 391, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 7-7-25.
Record of encumbrances.

Upon receipt of each purchase order filed with the State Fiscal Officer under the provisions of Section 7-7-23, the State Fiscal Officer shall, upon approval of such purchase order, make due entry of the same on the record of encumbrances, which shall be established in the General Accounting Office, showing separately thereon an account for each department, institution or other agency and the law authorizing the appropriation from which the same is to be paid, if from appropriated funds. Encumbrances so made and entered shall, until paid, be shown in the General Accounting Office’s books of account so as to be used as a liability against the then cash balance of the particular fund which is applicable, whether general or special, and against the appropriation balance, if the encumbrance is to be paid from appropriated funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-13; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 13; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 102; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-27.
Filing claims or invoices of purchases, services, etc.; waiver of certification that goods or services received under certain circumstances.

Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section, all claims against the state as the result of purchases, services, salaries, travel expense, or other encumbrances made or liabilities incurred by any officer, department, division, board, commission, institution or other agency of the state authorized to incur such obligations, whether as the result of the issuance of purchase orders, as hereinabove provided, or not, shall be filed with, certified and approved by the agency incurring such obligation pursuant to rules and regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration. These rules and regulations shall set forth certain circumstances where certification by the approving officers that the goods and services have been received or performed may be waived by the Department of Finance and Administration. Such waivers may pertain to, but should not be limited to, service contracts of limited time periods for lease of office space and equipment, computer software and subgrantee disbursements under federal grant programs.

The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the local board of trustees of a community or junior college shall adopt rules and regulations for institutions under their governance for the waiver of certification that goods or services have been received or performed. These rules and regulations shall be consistent with those established by the Department of Finance and Administration under subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-14; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 14; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 103; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 12; Laws, 1990, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 387, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 391, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 445, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 492, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2014).

§ 7-7-29.
Requisitions or requests for payment of invoices.

No requisitions or requests for payment drawn against any funds in the Treasury shall be issued by any state agency, official or other person except on forms to be prescribed by the State Fiscal Officer; and none may be presented by the agency, official or other person to any claimant, but all shall be forwarded to the State Fiscal Officer, together with the invoice or invoices covering same, as herein prescribed. The form of all requisitions shall be such as to prevent their being cashed by a bank or other institution, agency or person, it being the intention of the Legislature herein to prevent the payment of state funds to any claimant except upon state warrants regularly and legally issued by the State Fiscal Officer after he shall have submitted the claim to regular audit, examination and verification, as prescribed herein. Payments may be made to claimants on electronic funds transfers without a state warrant as provided under Section 7-9-14. The Department of Human Services and any other agencies meeting the requirements of Sections 7-9-41 and 7-9-43, wherein provision is made in certain cases for the withdrawal of funds from the Treasury in lump sums on State Fiscal Officer warrants, shall not be deemed to be in violation of the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-15; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 15; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 104; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 13; Laws, 1994, ch. 391, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 7-7-31.
Payroll requisitions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 7-7-27 and 7-7-29, it shall not be necessary that a separate statement, invoice or requisition shall be issued for each person on payrolls for salaries and wages of state employees. Regular forms to be prescribed by the State Fiscal Officer shall be used, covering all employees but listing each name separately and giving all pertinent information such as gross salary, the various withholdings, and the net salary, together with such other information as the State Fiscal Officer may require.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-16; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 16; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 105; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-33.
Pre-audit of claims.

The State Fiscal Officer shall issue disbursement warrants upon satisfactory pre-audit as prescribed by standards and procedures established by the State Fiscal Officer in consultation with the State Auditor’s office. Such standards and procedures shall include examination of the bill, invoice, account, payroll or other evidence of the claim, demand or charge and determination that the expenditure or disbursement is regular, legal and correct, and that the claim, demand or charge has not been previously paid. In order to ascertain that goods have been received or services rendered, the State Fiscal Officer may require such evidence as the circumstances may demand. If the expenditure or disbursement is proper, the State Fiscal Officer shall approve the same; otherwise, the State Fiscal Officer shall withhold approval. In order that such regularity and legality may appear, the State Fiscal Officer may return the claim to the department, institution or agency against which the same was issued for correction or amendment and may, by general rule or special order, require such certification or such evidence as the circumstances may demand.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-17; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 17; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 106; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-35.
Issuance of warrants for payment of claims; exception for electronic transfer of funds.

After the allowance of any claim which is payable out of the State Treasury under any of the provisions of Sections 7-7-1 through 7-7-65, a warrant shall be issued for the sum to be paid, except as otherwise provided in Section 7-9-14. A register of all warrants so issued shall be kept by the State Fiscal Officer and a duplicate register shall be kept for the State Treasurer, which duplicate register shall be duly attested to by the State Fiscal Officer, or the employees he may designate for that purpose, and be filed daily with the said Treasurer, or at such periods during the day as may be necessary. All warrants on the Treasurer shall be signed by the State Fiscal Officer, as required elsewhere in these statutes, or by such employees as he may designate for that purpose. Such signature may be made by means of such mechanical or electrical device as the State Fiscal Officer may select, after the same shall have been approved by the State Fiscal Officer. Such device shall be safely kept so that no one shall have access thereto except the State Fiscal Officer and such employees as may be authorized to sign warrants as herein provided. All such warrants shall be delivered by mail, or by messenger, or by personal service to the officer, department, institution or agency against which the claim involving the issuance of such warrant was made, and shall be delivered therefrom to the claimant.

Periodically, such warrants of each department, institution or agency shall be mailed or handed directly to the claimant by someone other than the person preparing the requisition for payment in accordance with the control procedures established by the department, institution or agency. The State Fiscal Officer, at his discretion, may mail or deliver directly to the claimant the warrants for any department, institution or agency, or verify by some other means that delivery was made to the claimant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-18; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 18; Laws, 1983, ch. 355, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 107; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 16; Laws, 1994, ch. 391, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 7-7-37.
Warrants; to whom payable.

The State Fiscal Officer shall write warrants payable to the order of the person, firm, institution or agency entitled thereto for all monies which, by law, are directed to be paid out of the Treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-19; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 19; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 108; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-7-39.
Warrants to be drawn within appropriation or budget.

The State Fiscal Officer shall not draw warrants without, or in excess of, appropriations of money for the purpose, except in those cases specifically provided for by law; nor shall the State Fiscal Officer draw warrants against budgeted funds until notified by certification that the budget for the current allotment period of the fiscal year for the department, institution, or agency concerned is in compliance with the appropriation, and the amount of the approved budget has been set up in the State Fiscal Officer’s records; nor shall the State Fiscal Officer draw warrants in excess of the amount so budgeted and approved, nor shall the State Fiscal Officer draw any warrant in excess of the cash balance then available in the particular fund against which the warrant is chargeable unless the warrant is to be drawn against federal programs in which federal funds are receipted based upon policies and procedures as established by the State Fiscal Officer or in other situations as deemed necessary by the State Fiscal Officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-20; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 20; Laws, 1970, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 109; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 18; Laws, 1992, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 397, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 7-7-40.
Authority of State Fiscal Officer to approve escalations in budgets.

The State Fiscal Officer shall have the authority to approve escalations in a budget using special funds pursuant to specific authorization stated in an appropriation bill. Upon written documentation submitted by an agency head, the State Fiscal Officer shall also have the authority to approve escalations to a budget using donated or endowment funds designated for a specific purpose and using insurance proceeds as a result of damage to state property. Such escalations may not exceed the amount of such donated or endowment funds or insurance proceeds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 66; Laws, 2000, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 7-7-41.
Rules and regulations.

The State Fiscal Officer may promulgate such regulations and procedures as he may deem necessary in regard to preauditing and postauditing claims and issuing warrants covering payments for construction contracts entered into by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, the Department of Finance and Administration, the State Department of Education, or by any other agency now existing or hereafter created, having control and supervision of the awarding and payment of construction contracts.

The State Fiscal Officer shall prescribe rules and regulations concerning the preauditing and postauditing of claims and the issuance of warrants and other forms of payments for all departments, institutions and agencies of the state, more particularly those coming within the provisions of Sections 7-9-41 and 7-9-43, after full discussion with the fiscal officers thereof, to the end that the most efficient overall state accounting system may be maintained. Such regulations, however, shall be of such nature and application that the State Fiscal Officer shall be able to maintain adequate records in his books of accounts of all fiscal operations of the state, and in no event shall the regular audit of the transactions of such departments, institutions and agencies by the State Department of Audit be suspended.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3852-21; Laws, 1962, ch. 483, § 21; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 110; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 19; Laws, 2000, ch. 477, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 7-7-42.
Limitation of time for payment of warrants.

Any State of Mississippi warrant issued by the State Fiscal Officer against any fund in the State Treasury which has not been presented to the State Treasurer for payment within one (1) year after the last day of the month in which it was originally issued, shall be null and void, the obligation thereafter shall be unenforceable and the State Fiscal Officer shall not issue an additional warrant.

The State Fiscal Officer is authorized and directed to cancel all outstanding warrants over one (1) year old at the end of each month and shall notify the State Treasurer who shall remove such warrants from his list of outstanding warrants.

The State Fiscal Officer shall transfer the funds reflected by the cancellation of the warrant to the Abandoned Property Fund authorized by Section 89-12-37 of the Unclaimed Property Division of the State Treasury where the funds shall remain for five (5) years. After five (5) years, if the funds are unclaimed, the State Treasurer shall transfer the funds back to the original source of funds.

This section is applicable to warrants issued on and after January 1, 2000.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 409; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 111; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 20; Laws, 2000, ch. 501, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 27, 2000).